Hawaii statutes.
§431:2-105 Deputies, employees. (a)
There shall be a chief deputy commissioner, who shall be subject to chapter
76. The chief deputy commissioner shall have the power to perform any act or
duty assigned by the commissioner. If a commissioner
has not been appointed, the chief deputy commissioner shall have the power to
perform any act that the commissioner is authorized to perform until an
appointment becomes effective. The certificate of the chief deputy
commissioner's appointment shall be filed in the office of the lieutenant
governor.

(b) There may be additional deputy
commissioners and examiners and actuarial, technical, and administrative
assistants and clerks for such purposes as the commissioner may designate. All
of the positions shall be subject to chapter 76.

(c) The commissioner may appoint a senior rate
and policy analyst who shall not be subject to chapter 76.

(d) The commissioner shall be responsible for
the official acts of the commissioner's deputies and employees.

(e) The commissioner may require any employee
to be bonded as the commissioner deems proper. The cost of the bond shall be
borne by the State. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1988, c 363, §2(1); am L
1999, c 246, §1; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2006, c 48, §7; am L 2011, c 81,
§1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next